Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2357.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 42-15001, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-15001. Assessed valuation of class one property The assessed valuation of class one property described in section 42-12001 is the following percentage of its full cash value or limited valuation, as applicable: 1. Twenty-five percent through December 31, 2005. 2. Twenty-four and one-half percent beginning from and after December 31, 2005 through December 31, 2006. 3. Twenty-four percent beginning from and after December 31, 2006 through December 31, 2007. 4. Twenty-three percent beginning from and after December 31, 2007 through December 31, 2008. 5. Twenty-two percent beginning from and after December 31, 2008 through December 31, 2009. 6. Twenty-one percent beginning from and after December 31, 2009 through December 31, 2010. 7. Twenty percent beginning from and after December 31, 2010 through December 31, 2012. 8. Nineteen and one-half percent beginning from and after December 31, 2012 through December 31, 2013. 9. Nineteen percent beginning from and after December 31, 2013 through December 31, 2014. 10. Eighteen and one-half percent beginning from and after December 31, 2014 through December 31, 2015. 11. Eighteen percent beginning from and after December 31, 2015 through December 31, 2021. 12. Seventeen and one-half percent beginning from and after December 31, 2021 through December 31, 2022. 13. Seventeen percent beginning from and after December 31, 2022 through December 31, 2023. 14. Sixteen and one-half percent beginning from and after December 31, 2023 through December 31, 2024. 15. Sixteen percent beginning from and after December 31, 2024 through December 31, 2025. 16. Fifteen and one-half percent beginning from and after December 31, 2025 through December 31, 2026. 17. Fifteen twenty percent beginning from and after December 31, 2026 through December 31, 2027. 18. Twenty-eight percent beginning from and after December 31, 2027. END_STATUTE